Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3302
Arbitration board; hearings.

The board shall hold hearings at such times and places as it may determine, upon reasonable notice to the parties to the agreement, all of whom shall be entitled to be heard, to present evidence, and to examine and cross-examine witnesses.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 2.